Utah statutes.
70A-9a-609.   Secured party's right to take possession after default.

(1)  After default, a secured party:

(a)  may take possession of the collateral; and

(b)  without removal, may render equipment unusable and dispose of collateral on a debtor's premises under Section 70A-9a-610.

(2)  A secured party may proceed under Subsection (1):

(a)  pursuant to judicial process; or

(b)  without judicial process, if it proceeds without breach of the peace.

(3) If so agreed, and in any event after default, a secured party may require the debtor to assemble the collateral and make it available to the secured party at a place to be designated by the secured party which is reasonably convenient to both parties.



Enacted by Chapter 252, 2000 General Session

